Illinois, session 104th, HB5173.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Human Services Act is amended 5by changing Section 1-95 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 1305/1-95)7    Sec. 1-95. Transition program grants.8    (a) The Department of Human Services shall establish a 9Section 14(c) transition program to award transition grants to 10eligible community agencies with active or pending Section 1114(c) certificates to aid in the transition away from 12subminimum wages for workers with disabilities. The goal of 13Section 14(c) transition program grants is to develop new 14opportunities and programs and grow capacity to respond to the 15needs of individuals with disabilities in their geographic 16area, including, but not limited to, supported employment, 17customized employment, self-employment, entrepreneurship, and 18diverse day programs that support meaningful days, choice, and 19community integration. The Department shall ensure equitable 20access to transition grants for all eligible holders of 21Section 14(c) certificates by (i) avoiding the concentration 22of funding among a limited number of grant recipients and (ii) 23promoting equity in the distribution of funds by being   HB5173- 2 -LRB104 19790 KTG 33240 b1inclusive of all geographic regions of the State, provider 2sizes, and transition needs. Every applicant that applies for 3grant funds and meets the grant criteria established by the 4Department shall be awarded a grant in an amount based upon the 5Department's funding criteria. 6    (b) Eligibility for Section 14(c) transition program 7grants shall be contingent upon community agencies submitting 8a transition plan. The Department shall provide example plans 9that community agencies may adapt. By January 1, 2025, the 10transition program grant funds shall be awarded in compliance 11with the Grant Accountability and Transparency Act. 12    (c) Grants shall be made by the Department to eligible 13holders of Section 14(c) certificates, consistent with the 14Grant Accountability and Transparency Act, to assist workers 15with disabilities who are working for subminimum wages to 16transition to competitive integrated employment and to support 17eligible Section 14(c) certificate holders. Grant funding 18shall be used to: 19        (1) provide competitive integrated employment;20        (2) assist individuals with disabilities who were 21    employed at subminimum wages to find and retain 22    competitive integrated employment; or23        (3) provide integrated community participation and 24    wraparound services for individuals with disabilities who 25    were employed at subminimum wages. 26    (c-5) As a condition of receiving a transition grant under   HB5173- 3 -LRB104 19790 KTG 33240 b1this Section each grant recipient shall submit progress 2reports to the Department twice annually on a form developed 3by the Department in consultation with the Illinois Council on 4Developmental Disabilities. The first report shall be 5submitted no later than October 31st and the second report 6shall be submitted no later than April 30th of each grant year. 7The progress report shall include, at a minimum:8        (1) the number of people served who were previously 9    paid subminimum wages;10        (2) employment outcomes, including competitive 11    integrated employment, supported employment, and non-work 12    community participation;13        (3) wage data before and after transition activities;14        (4) hours worked and employment retention indicators;15        (5) types of services and supports provided using 16    grant funds;17        (6) barriers encountered and corrective actions taken; 18    and19        (7) expenditures aligned to approved grant activities. 20    (c-6) The Department shall aggregate data collected under 21subsection (c-5) to support an analysis of statewide 22transition progress and alignment with the multi-year plan 23required under Section 16 of the Employment and Economic 24Opportunity for Persons with Disabilities Task Force Act. 25Aggregated non-identifiable data shall be made available to 26the public beginning January 1, 2027, and every January 1   HB5173- 4 -LRB104 19790 KTG 33240 b1thereafter. 2    (d) Beginning on January 1, 2026, the Department of Human 3Services shall provide an annual status report to the Governor 4and the General Assembly, incorporating data from each grant 5recipient, to demonstrate progress toward identified 6benchmarks. 7(Source: P.A. 103-1060, eff. 1-21-25.) 8    Section 10. The Employment and Economic Opportunity for 9Persons with Disabilities Task Force Act is amended by 10changing Section 16 as follows: 11    (20 ILCS 4095/16)12    Sec. 16. Multi-year plan toward elimination of Section 1314(c) certificates. By no later than July 1, 2025, the 14Employment and Economic Opportunity for Persons with 15Disabilities Task Force, with the Illinois Council on 16Developmental Disabilities and an academic partner with 17relevant subject matter expertise, shall create a multi-year 18plan of recommended actions, outcomes, and benchmarks in 19accordance with paragraphs (1) through (3) to help the State 20successfully eliminate on and after December 31, 2029 the use 21of certificates authorized under Section 14(c) of the federal 22Fair Labor Standards Act of 1938.23        (1) The multi-year plan shall include, but not be 24    limited to, all of the following:  HB5173- 5 -LRB104 19790 KTG 33240 b1            (A) Identification, gathering, and analytics of 2        data to inform the work of the Task Force, including, 3        but not limited to:4                (i) the total number of entities utilizing 5            Section 14(c) certificates;6                (ii) the total number of persons with 7            disabilities who are paid subminimum wages and the 8            total number of persons with disabilities who are 9            paid at least the applicable minimum wages;10                (iii) the total number of persons with 11            disabilities working in facility-based employment 12            paid at or above minimum wage.13            (B) Recommended actions, including additional 14        statutory, regulatory, or policy measures, including 15        State-supported activities to assist providers in 16        employing people with disabilities.17            (C) Recommended measurable outcomes for each year 18        of the plan. 19            (D) Recommended benchmarks for each year of the 20        plan. 21        (2) In developing the multi-year plan, the Task Force 22    shall consider:23            (A) The total available approximate number of 24        people with disabilities paid subminimum wages who 25        want to transition to competitive integrated 26        employment with supports.  HB5173- 6 -LRB104 19790 KTG 33240 b1            (B) The total available approximate number of 2        people with disabilities who do not wish to pursue 3        competitive integrated employment and who would 4        benefit from alternative meaningful day opportunities.5            (C) Existing State employment programs designed to 6        support workers with disabilities.7            (D) An evaluation of capacity limits in providers' 8        contracts with the Department of Human Services' 9        Division of Rehabilitation Services and Division of 10        Developmental Disabilities.11            (E) The personal choice of persons with 12        disabilities regarding employment goals and planning 13        in person-centered planning processes.14            (F) The use of existing and emerging technologies 15        that could assist persons with disabilities in 16        achieving employment goals.17            (G) The impact of access to reliable 18        transportation on achieving employment goals and 19        ongoing employment.20            (H) An analysis that shall include data on:21                (i) the activities of youth with disabilities 22            within one year of exiting high school;23                (ii) the count of schools holding Student 24            Transition Employment Program and Pre-Employment 25            Transition Services contracts with the Division of 26            Rehabilitation Services that includes the count of   HB5173- 7 -LRB104 19790 KTG 33240 b1            students with ongoing cases who transition to 2            adult services;3                (iii) the number of students 14 1/2 through 22 4            years of age with individualized education plans 5            indicating a need for home and community-based 6            adult services.7            (I) The potential changes to State law, 8        regulations, or policies to protect means-tested 9        benefits for persons with disabilities as they pursue 10        employment-related goals.11            (J) Dissemination of information regarding 12        employment supports and benefits to individuals with 13        disabilities, consumers of public services, employers, 14        service providers, and State and local agency staff. 15        Information shall include the Ticket to Work program, 16        Work Incentives Planning and Assistance Programs, 17        Illinois ABLE, and Health Benefits for Workers with 18        Disabilities. 19            (K) The education and training needs of staff 20        working in community-based provider agencies toward 21        advancing competitive, integrated work options for 22        persons with disabilities, in areas including, but not 23        limited to:24                (i) employment options;25                (ii) non-employment options;26                (iii) home and community-based services and   HB5173- 8 -LRB104 19790 KTG 33240 b1            supports;2                (iv) self-advocacy;3                (v) benefits planning;4                (vi) asset building;5                (vii) assistive technology; 6                (viii) certification programs; and7                (ix) mental health services and supports.8            (L) Agreements between State agencies and 9        community-based providers that promote flexibility and 10        allow for expansion.11            (M) Ongoing review of rates and reimbursements 12        that support various employment programs for persons 13        with disabilities, including competitive, integrated 14        employment, customized employment, and supported 15        employment.16            (N) The need to further engage the private 17        business community to hire persons with disabilities 18        through incentives that may include specialized 19        educational opportunities, distribution of literature 20        at points of interaction with government licensing 21        agencies, and tax incentives to hiring persons with 22        disabilities.23            (O) The availability and need for adequate 24        benefits planning services for workers with 25        disabilities. 26            (P) The availability and need for meaningful day   HB5173- 9 -LRB104 19790 KTG 33240 b1        services for individuals with disabilities who prefer 2        not to work. 3            (Q) Enhanced service and support needs of aging 4        adults with developmental disabilities who have been 5        engaged in subminimum wage work, including, but not 6        limited to, activities of daily living, behavioral 7        supports, and medical supports, including 8        administration of medications while participating in 9        employment supports and community day services through 10        the Department of Human Services. 11        (3) In developing the multi-year plan, the Task Force 12    shall consult with employment service providers, people 13    with disabilities, disability trade associations, and 14    disability advocacy organizations. 15        (4) The Task Force shall submit the multi-year plan to 16    the Governor and the General Assembly by no later than 17    July 1, 2025. Annual reports on implementation shall be 18    required by no later than January 1 of each subsequent 19    year through January 1, 2030.20        (5) The Task Force shall provide annual updates to the 21    Governor and the General Assembly through January 1, 2035 22    on the employment of persons with disabilities in 23    Illinois.24        (6) The Governor shall appoint at least 2 additional 25    members to the Task Force who represent organizations that 26    are current Section 14(c) certificate holders. The   HB5173- 10 -LRB104 19790 KTG 33240 b1    Director of Labor, or the Director's designee, shall serve 2    on the Task Force in a non-voting, advisory capacity until 3    July 1, 2025. 4        (7) The Department of Human Services shall ensure that 5    there is project management for statewide implementation 6    of the multi-year plan under the Dignity in Pay Act, 7    Public Act 103-1060, through December 31, 2029. Project 8    management responsibilities shall include: (i) the 9    development and maintenance of a comprehensive 10    implementation plan with milestones; (ii) coordination 11    across State agencies, service providers, and technical 12    assistance entities; (iii) monitoring progress toward 13    achieving statutory benchmarks; (iv) the identification 14    and mitigation of risk; and (v) the preparation of 15    required reports to the Governor and General Assembly in 16    partnership with the Illinois Council on Developmental 17    Disabilities and the Employment and Economic Opportunity 18    for Persons with Disabilities Task Force.19        Project management functions may be administered 20    through an intergovernmental agreement or a grant with an 21    entity that demonstrates expertise in developmental 22    disability systems transformation.23        (8) The Department of Human Services shall ensure the 24    availability of ongoing technical assistance to eligible 25    Section 14(c) certificate holders throughout the 26    transition period ending on December 31, 2029. Technical   HB5173- 11 -LRB104 19790 KTG 33240 b1    assistance shall include (i) individualized provider 2    coaching, (ii) cohort-based learning opportunities, (iii) 3    open office hours for real-time problem-solving, (iv) 4    support for financial modeling, service redesign, and 5    workforce development, and (v) assistance to State 6    agencies to align policies and systems with transition 7    goals and recommendations outlined in the multi-year plan. 8    Technical assistance shall be provided by entities with 9    demonstrated expertise in disability employment systems 10    and provider transformation.11        (9) Funds appropriated for Section 14(c) transition 12    purposes may be used for (i) transition program grants to 13    eligible providers, (ii) statewide project management and 14    coordination, and (iii) technical assistance and 15    capacity-building supports. The Department shall balance 16    investments to ensure provider participation, statewide 17    consistency, and long-term system sustainability. 18(Source: P.A. 103-1060, eff. 1-21-25.) 19    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 20becoming law.